Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 15. Kentucky Communications Network Authority

154.15-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter:

“Authority” means the Kentucky Communications Network Authority;

“Board” means the Board of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority;

“Executive director” means the executive director of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority;

“Network” or “KentuckyWired” means the Commonwealth’s open-access broadband network; and

“Partnership” means the public-private partnership entered into between the Commonwealth and a private entity or entities for the purpose of creating, running, and maintaining the network.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 89, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

154.15-020.
Kentucky Communications Network Authority — Duties — Personnel — Powers.

The Kentucky Communications Network Authority is established and shall be attached to the Office of the Governor. The authority shall be headed by an executive director who shall be hired by the board and approved by the Governor.

Notwithstanding KRS 42.726, the duties of the authority shall be to:

Oversee and maintain KentuckyWired, the Commonwealth’s open-access broadband network;

Manage the master agreement establishing the public-private partnership between the Commonwealth and its private industry partner or partners. The purpose of the agreement is to design, engineer, build, operate, maintain, and upgrade the network;

Provide network connectivity to public agencies;

Offer access to entities eligible to utilize excess capacity on the network;

Manage other aspects of the network and its utilization through the executive director and with oversight and input from the board established in KRS 154.15-030 and the advisory group established in this section;

Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement the purposes of this subchapter;

Enter into contracts with public and private entities to carry out its duties and responsibilities. A contract or other agreement involving the acquisition or disposition of a property interest by the Commonwealth shall be signed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. KRS Chapters 45A and 56 may require the secretary’s signature on other contracts or agreements;

Provide program management services ensuring the financial viability of the master agreement and related contracts and agreements, including grant administration, contract compliance and oversight, community planning support, and constituent services;

Seek out, secure, and manage funding sources for the network; and

Create an advisory group, including major stakeholders, to provide input and feedback on issues important to the user community and to the long-term sustainability of the project and the network. The advisory group shall be administratively attached to and managed by the authority. The advisory group shall include but not be limited to representatives of:

The Department of Education;

The Council on Postsecondary Education;

The Cabinet for Economic Development;

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

The Transportation Cabinet;

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

The Finance and Administration Cabinet;

The Administrative Office of the Courts;

The Legislative Research Commission;

Institutions of higher education;

Local government entities;

Libraries;

Public health care institutions or agencies;

Kentucky Educational Television; and

Others whose input will benefit the network.

With the approval of the board, the executive director may hire additional officers and other personnel necessary for the proper functioning of the authority, fix their salaries, and prescribe their duties. The executive director and persons employed by the authority shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.

With the approval of the board, the executive director may make, execute, and effectuate contracts, leveraging future revenues from provision of government-to-government services and sale or lease of excess capacity, to incur debt in the name of the authority and enter into financing agreements with the Commonwealth, agencies of the Commonwealth, lending institutions, investors, or investing entities.
(4) (a)

With the approval of the board, the executive director may make, execute, and effectuate contracts, leveraging future revenues from provision of government-to-government services and sale or lease of excess capacity, to incur debt in the name of the authority and enter into financing agreements with the Commonwealth, agencies of the Commonwealth, lending institutions, investors, or investing entities.

The total amount of debt or financing under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000), and shall not leverage any future revenues committed to the repayment of any other debt, or expected to be used for the repayment of any other debt, as of the time the debt or financing is entered into.

Any proposed debt or financing under this subsection shall be submitted to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for review at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting.

If any debt or financing is incurred under this subsection, the authority shall provide to the Legislative Research Commission:

Within thirty (30) days of entering into a debt or financing agreement, a copy of the agreement; and

On January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year that the debt or financing is outstanding:

The amount of principal and interest remaining on the debt or financing;

The use to which the capital gained from the debt or financing has been put; and

Any amendments, if any, to the original debt or financing instruments or agreements.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 89, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 201, § 1, effective April 26, 2018.

154.15-030.
Board of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority — Membership — Duties — Meetings — Committees.

The Board of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority is established. The board shall be attached administratively to the Office of the Governor.

The board shall consist of:

The secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet or designee, who shall serve as chair of the board;

The state budget director or designee;

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or designee;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or designee;

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or designee; and

A representative designated by the Center for Rural Development.

The duties of the board shall be to:

Develop and implement a strategic plan for and provide policy direction to the authority;

Review performance reports from the partners named in the master agreement regarding deployment, operations, and administration of the network and its compliance with service level agreements with the Commonwealth;

Monitor the results achieved through the partnership’s strategy to develop new revenue streams and expand network usage through marketing and awareness programs;

Approve fiscal planning for the authority including budget development, state appropriations management, cost-recovery schedules, grant administration, and billing services;

Establish rates for services offered through the network and establish methods for customer account management; and

Direct upgrades to technology as necessary.

The board shall meet at least semiannually and at other times upon the call of the chair.

The board may form committees or other subgroups as necessary to accomplish its duties and functions.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 89, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.